Vermont statutes. Title 6 Agriculture
Subchapter 2. Generally

§ 2963.
Agricultural Development Division.

A division of agricultural development is created within the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets as the successor to and the continuation of the Agricultural Markets Development Division.

The Development Division may:

Assist individuals and organizations in developing ways which will increase the agricultural use of Vermont lands and other agricultural resources;

Assist in maintaining a price reporting system to service the agricultural community of Vermont;

Develop and maintain a directory of producers of food, livestock, and fiber products;

Identify and develop new markets for agricultural products and assist in the development of new products which might play a significant part in the expansion of agriculture in Vermont;

Assist in developing the Vermont product identification program created in section 2964 of this title;

Develop an advertising program for Vermont agricultural products;

Assist in the promotion of research on agricultural products.

HISTORY:

Added

1975, No. 217

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

1989, No. 256

(Adj. Sess.), § 10(a), eff. Jan. 1, 1991;

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003.

§§ 2963a,
2964.
Repealed. 2011, No. 142 (Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. May 15, 2012.

§ 2964a.
Spring or artesian water; labels.

A bottler of spring or artesian water may apply to the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets for a specially designated identification label to indicate that the water originated and was bottled in Vermont and that it complies with any quality requirements adopted by the Agency. The bottler requesting the labels shall annually pay a minimum fee of $20.00 and the cost of all labels requested. The bottler shall also obtain approval from the Department of Environmental Conservation under

10 V.S.A. § 1673

to qualify for a label under this subsection.

The labels provided for in this section shall be designed and issued by the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets and shall not be similar to the labels issued under section 2964 of this title.

Funds received under this section shall be retained by the Agency for administration of this section in accordance with the provisions of 32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 5.

A person who fraudulently utilizes the labels issued under this section, who willingly allows another to use the labels fraudulently, or who applies the labels to water which does not meet quality standards adopted by the Secretary shall be fined not more than $500.00 for each offense. In the case of a continuing violation, each day the offense continues shall constitute a separate offense, with the maximum amount of fine assessed not to exceed $10,000.00 per violation.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 47

, § 1; amended

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003.

§ 2965.
Misuse of labels; penalty.

No person shall use, nor allow another person to use, an identification label designed and issued by the Secretary under section 2964 of this title without authorization of the Secretary.

A person who violates this section commits a civil violation and shall be assessed a penalty of not less than $500.00.

In addition to the penalties set forth in this section, the Secretary may take any action authorized under 6 V.S.A. chapter 1 to enforce the requirements of section 2964 of this title and the rules adopted pursuant to that section.

HISTORY:

Added

1975, No. 217

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

1983, No. 13

, § 2;

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2009, No. 78

(Adj. Sess.), § 6c.

§ 2966.
Repealed. 2015, No. 39, § 25.